West Virginia, session 2026, SB339.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 7. Authorization for Department of Revenue to promulgate legislative rules. §64-7-1. Commissioner of Financial Institutions. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on February 3, 2025, authorized under the authority of §31A-8G-3 of this code, relating to the Commissioner of Financial Institutions  (Fintech Regulatory Sandbox Program, 106 CSR 21), is authorized.